Utah statutes.
41-6a-715.   Controlled-access highways -- Prohibiting use by class or kind
of traffic -- Traffic-control devices.
(1) A highway authority may regulate or prohibit the use of any controlled-
access highway within its respective jurisdiction by any class or kind of
traffic which is found to be incompatible with the normal and safe movement of
traffic.
(2)  The highway authority shall erect and maintain traffic-control devices on
the controlled-access highway on which the regulations or prohibitions are
applicable.
